District of Columbia statutes.
47-892

Establishment of special assessment district.

There is established as a special assessment district the Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Benefit District, which shall be comprised of those real properties served by or otherwise specially benefitting from the Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Project, more particularly described as all real properties included in the following squares or portions of squares: 0695, 0695W, 0695NW, 0696, 0697N, 0699, 0699N, 0700, 0701, 0707, the portions of 0708 and 0708E east of South Capitol Street (as South Capitol Street existed on June 1, 2007), 0738, 0740, 0743N, 0744S, and 0744SS, and any future subdivisions of these squares and lots.

Jan. 29, 2007, D.C. Law 17-89, § 2(b), 54 DCR 11919
This section is referenced in § 47-891.